Hawaii statutes.
§412:11-105 Sanctions for failure to
register or submit reports. Any financial institution holding company
failing to register or furnish any report or information as and when required
under this article, shall be subject to an administrative fine of not more than
$200 for each day that it fails to register or for each day that any such
report is delinquent, which fine shall be recovered pursuant to the provisions
of section 412:2-611. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next